District of Columbia statutes.
42-801

Execution, acknowledgment, and recordation in same manner as deeds.

Mortgages and deeds of trust to secure debts, conveying any estate in land, shall be executed and may be acknowledged and recorded in the same manner as absolute deeds; and they shall take effect both as between the parties thereto and as to others, bona fide purchasers and mortgagees and creditors, in the same manner and under the same conditions as absolute deeds.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1271, ch. 854, § 521
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 532, ch. 1329
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601, 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(b), 49 DCR 2551

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-815.02 and § 42-815.04.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-701.
1973 Ed., § 45-601.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-132 revived this section as of November 6, 2001. This section had been previously repealed by D.C. Law 13-263, § 1601.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).

Emergency Legislation

Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) revival of section, see § 403(b) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).

Editor's Notes

Section 602(b) of D.C. Law 14-132, as amended by section 42(b) of D.C. Law 14-213, provided: “Sections 95, 521, 522, 523, 534, 535, 536, 537, 538, 539, 539a, 544, and 545 of An Act To establish a code of law for the District of Columbia, approved March 3, 1901 (31 Stat. 1271; D.C. Official Code §§ 42-801, 42-802, 42-803, 42-804, 42-811, 42-812, 42-813, 42-814, 42-815, 42-815.01, 42-816, 42-817, 42-818, and 42-819) and sections 1, 2, 3, 11, 13, 14, and 26 of the Compiled Statutes of the District of Columbia (D.C. Official Code §§ 42-805, 42-806, 42-807, 42-808, 42-809, 42-810, and 42-820), and the regulations adopted thereunder, are revived as of November 6, 2001.”